Utah statutes.
4-24-17.   Transportation of sheep, cattle, domesticated elk, horses, or mules -- Brand certificate or other evidence of ownership required -- Transit permit -- Contents.

(1)  No person may transport any sheep, cattle, horses, domesticated elk, or mules without having an official state brand certificate or other proof of ownership in his possession.

(2)  Each person transporting livestock for another person shall have a transit permit signed by the owner or the owner's authorized agent specifying the:

(a)  name of the person driving the vehicle;

(b)  date of transportation;

(c)  place of origin or loading;

(d)  destination;

(e)  date of issuance; and

(f)  number of animals being transported.



Amended by Chapter 302, 1997 General Session

